Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-236
Officer or employee of state; membership on or service to authority; how treated.

Notwithstanding any other law, no officer or employee of this state shall be deemed to have forfeited or shall forfeit his or her office or employment by reason of acceptance of membership in the authority or of providing services to such authority.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 36;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 37.